Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1007.04
Elementary
class size allowance; calculation.

(1) For school
fiscal years 2008-09 through 2012-13, the department shall determine the elementary
class size allowance for each school district from information submitted by a school district on a form
prescribed by the department on or before October 15 of the school fiscal
year preceding the school fiscal year for which aid is being calculated.

(2) For school fiscal year 2008-09, the allowance shall equal
the statewide average general fund operating expenditures per formula student
multiplied by 0.20 then multiplied by the number of students in the school
district in kindergarten through grade eight who qualify for free or reduced-price
lunches and who spend at least fifty percent of the school day in a classroom
with a minimum of ten students and a maximum of twenty students as reported
on the fall membership report from the school fiscal year immediately preceding
the school fiscal year in which the aid is to be paid.

(3) For school fiscal years 2009-10 through 2012-13, the
allowance shall equal the statewide average general fund operating expenditures
per formula student multiplied by twenty percent of the number of students
in the school district in kindergarten through grade three who spend at least
fifty percent of the school day in one or more classrooms with a minimum of
ten students and a maximum of twenty students as reported on the fall membership
report from the school fiscal year immediately preceding the school fiscal
year in which the aid is to be paid for state aid certified pursuant to section
79-1022 and as reported on the annual statistical summary report from the
school fiscal year immediately preceding the school fiscal year in which the
aid was paid for the final calculation of state aid pursuant to section 79-1065.

Laws 2006, LB 1024, § 77;

Laws 2007, LB641, § 17;

Laws 2008, LB988, § 27;

Laws 2010, LB1071, § 14.